North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-35 Water Districts
61-35-94.
Rejection of bids — Readvertising for bids or construction by district without contract — Reevaluation of project.

If in its opinion the best interests of the district require, the board may reject any and all bids filed under this chapter. If all bids are rejected, the board may:

Readvertise for new bids;

Cause the work described in the plans, specifications, and estimates to be done directly by the district by the employment of labor and the purchase of materials required, or in any other manner the board considers proper, and payment for the work may be provided through special assessments in the same manner as though the work had been performed under contract, provided this work amounts to no more than the amount provided for construction of a public improvement under section 48-01.2-02; or

Cause the work described in the plans, specifications, and estimates to be reviewed and re-evaluated by the engineer for the district so that the board may determine whether the entire project or only a portion of the project is feasible.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2003, ch. 554, § 5; 2007, ch. 403, § 27.

61-35-95.
Engineer’s statement of estimated cost required — Board to enter into contracts.

Before adopting or rejecting any bid filed under this chapter, the board shall require the engineer for the district to make a careful and detailed statement of the estimated cost of the work. The board may not award the contract to any bidder if the engineer’s estimate prepared under this section exceeds the engineer’s estimate prepared under section 61-35-54 by forty percent or more. If all bids are not rejected, the board shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder, upon the basis of cash payment for the work, if the bidder has furnished the certified check or bidder’s bond required under the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-96.
Contractor’s bond — Execution.

Within the time fixed by the board for executing the contract, the successful bidder shall file with the district a contract bond in a sum equal to the full amount of the contract. The bond must be executed by the bidder or contractor as principal and by a surety company authorized to do business in this state as surety.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-97.
Conditions for contractor’s bond.

The contractor’s bond must be made payable to the district and must be conditioned:

That the contractor well and faithfully will perform the work bid for in accordance with the terms of and within the time provided for in the contract, and pursuant to the plans and specifications for the work on file in the district office;

That the contractor will pay for all labor and material used in that work; and

That in case of a default on the part of the bidder or contractor in the performance of the work as provided in the contract, the sum named in the bond must be taken and held to cover the amount necessary to compensate the district for the correction, repair, or replacement caused by the default, and that the full amount may be recovered from the bidder and the bidder’s sureties in an action by the district against them on the bond only in the event of a complete failure of performance on the part of the contractor. Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent the district from receiving the amount, not in excess of the amount of the bond, necessary to compensate the district for correction, repair, or replacement caused by default of the contractor which does not constitute complete failure of performance by the contractor.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-98.
Approval of bonds — Return of bidder’s bond.

The contractor’s bond must be approved by the governing body, and thereupon it is and remains in full force and effect. Upon the execution of the contract and the approval of the contract bond, the bidder’s bond must be returned.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-99.
Failure to execute contractor’s bond.

If the successful bidder, within ten days after the acceptance of the bid or such further time as the board may grant, does not execute a contractor’s bond and a contract for the completion of the work described in the bid, the board may cause the work to be done, or it may contract with some other contractor to do or complete the work. In that case, the district may recover in a suit on the defaulting bidder’s bond the difference between the actual cost to the district of the improvements and the sum that it would have cost if the defaulting bidder had complied with the bidder’s bid.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-100.
Insufficiency of bonds — New bonds required — Failure to furnish.

If the board, at any time, deems the bond of a contractor insufficient either in form or as to sureties, it may require the successful bidder or contractor to furnish, within such reasonable time as the board may fix, a new bond to be approved by the board. If the contractor fails, after notice, to furnish the new bond within the time required, the contractor’s contract may be canceled, and in that event the contractor’s bond will be liable as if the contractor had failed to perform the contract.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-101.
Execution and filing of contract.

All contracts entered into for any work provided for in this chapter must be entered into in the name of the district and must be executed on the part of the district by the president and countersigned by the secretary. After the contract is signed by the contractor, it must be filed in the office of the district.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-102.
Conditions and terms.

A contract let under this chapter requires the work to be done pursuant to the plans and specifications on file in the office of the district, subject to the approval of the engineer acting for the district, and must provide:

That the board has the right to suspend the work at any time for improper construction and to relet the contract or to order a reconstruction of the work as to any part improperly done.

The time within which the work must be completed.

The period of time for which the work must be guaranteed as to workmanship and materials.

The fund from which the contract price is to be paid by the district.

That the consideration expressed in the contract is payable only in bonds drawn on the fund described in the contract.

That the district assumes and incurs no general liability under the contract.

That failure of the engineer to reject work and materials that are not up to specifications and acceptance of the job by the engineer does not release the contractor from liability for any failure on the contractor’s part to perform work or furnish materials in accordance with the plans and specifications.

The engineer acting for the district shall provide construction administration and observation of the work during its progress. In addition to any rights a district may have under its contract for construction of part or all of an improvement after a contract has been awarded and before work under the contract has been completed, a district, with the consent of the contractor and without advertising for bids, may order additional work done by that contractor of the same character as the work that was contracted for, whether within or without the improvement district for which the original contract was made, and upon the same terms and conditions specified in the original contract except as to time of performance, and at the same prices for the additional work; provided, that the total price payable to the contractor for the additional work may not exceed twenty percent of the amount estimated by the engineer for the district to be payable for that character of work under the original contract.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 1997, ch. 353, § 3.

61-35-103.
Contractor to be paid during progress of work — Retainage — Failure to pay — Rate of interest — Investment of retainage.

If the contractor to whom a contract is let properly performs the work designated in the contract, the board, at least once in each calendar month during the continuance of the contract work, shall meet and receive and consider estimates furnished by the agent, engineer, or architect acting for the district or if not so furnished, then by the contractor, and shall allow such estimates in an amount of the estimated value of the labor and material furnished upon the contract, and of the material then upon the ground for use in the contract, subject to retentions as follows: ten percent of each estimate presented until such time as the project is fifty percent completed, with no further retainage on estimates during the continuance of the contract. Upon completion of ninety-five percent of the contract according to the estimates, the board may pay to the contractor ninety-five percent of the amount retained from previous estimates. Any amount retained after ninety-five percent completion of the contract must be paid to the contractor in such amounts and at such times as are approved by the district, upon estimates by its agent, engineer, or architect or the contractor, with final payment of all moneys due to the contractor to be made immediately following completion and acceptance of the project. Immediately after considering and allowing any such estimate, the board shall certify and forward the same to the district treasurer or other official having the power to draw bonds, who forthwith shall draw a warrant upon the proper fund and transmit the same promptly to the contractor. If the board fails or neglects to receive and allow such estimate or certify any estimate or final payment upon completion and acceptance or the proper officer required to issue such warrant fails or neglects to issue a warrant as provided in this section, for a period of more than thirty days from the date of such estimate or completion date, then the estimate or final payment, together with any retainage properly payable, draws interest from its date at the rate per annum of two percentage points below the Bank of North Dakota prime interest rate as set thirty days from the date of such estimate or completion date until the issuance of a proper warrant. Interest must be computed and added to the face of the estimate, final payment, or retainage by the officer required to issue the warrant, must be included in the warrant when drawn, and must be charged to the fund from which payment for the improvement is to be made. On the amounts of estimates retained, as provided in this section, the board, authorized committee, or public body in charge of the work may invest or deposit the retained amounts in any financial association or institution in this state earning interest or dividends for the benefit of the contractor. Any amounts so invested or deposited must remain in the name of the board, authorized committee, or public body in charge of the work until final payment of all money due to the contractor is to be made. Further, a contractor may not use or pledge such amount in any manner until released and received by the contractor upon completion of the contract.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.